District of Columbia statutes.
47-2512

Savings clause.

(a)

Existing rights and liabilities. —

The repeal or amendment of any provision of this chapter, shall not affect any act done or any right accruing or accrued, or any suit or proceeding had or commenced in any civil cause before such repeal or amendment, but all rights and liabilities under this chapter shall continue, and may be enforced in the same manner and to the same extent, as if such repeal or amendment had not been made.

(b)

Offenses and penalties. —

All offenses committed and penalties incurred, under any provision of law hereby repealed or amended, may be prosecuted and punished in the same manner and with the same effect as if this chapter had not been enacted.

Sept. 13, 1980, D.C. Law 3-95, § 403, 27 DCR 3509
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575

History

1981 Ed., § 47-2512.

Prior Codifications